Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-43] Liens against units. (a)
For purposes of this section:

(1) "Visible commencement of operations"
shall have the meaning it has in section 507‑41; and

(2) "Lien" means a lien created pursuant to
chapter 507, part II.

(b) If visible commencement of operations
occurs prior to the creation of the condominium, then, upon creation of the
condominium, liens arising from this work shall attach to all units in the
condominium described in the declaration and their respective undivided
interests in the common elements, but not to the common elements as a whole.
If visible commencement of operations occurs after creation of the condominium,
then liens arising from this work shall attach only to the unit or units
described in the declaration on which the work was performed in the same manner
as other real property, and shall not attach to the common elements.

(c) If the developer contracts for work on the
common elements, either on its behalf or on behalf of the association prior to
the first meeting of the association, then liens arising from this work may
attach to all units owned by the developer described in the declaration at the
time of visible commencement of operations.

(d) If the association contracts for work on
the common elements after the first meeting of the association, there shall be
no lien on the common elements, but the persons contracting with the
association to perform the work or supply the materials incorporated in the
work shall be entitled to their contractual remedies, if any. [L 2005, c 93, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next